Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB415.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 17A OF KRS CHAPTER 304 IS CREATED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "otherwise specifically indicated or provided" means that the section or another
section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes:
(a) Expressly states that the section is applicable to; and
(b) Specifically refers to;
a type of insurance, coverage, or benefits that is excluded under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Unless otherwise specifically indicated or provided, the sections of this subtitle shall not apply to or affect
any of the following:
(a) Policies, plans, certificates, or contracts covering only accident, credit, dental, vision, or specified
disease, illness, or condition;
(b) Disability income insurance;
(c) Paid family leave insurance;
(d) Long-term care insurance;
(e) Short-term nursing home insurance;
(f) Medicare supplement insurance;
(g) Hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance;
(h) Coverage provided under a limited health service benefit plan, as defined in KRS 304.17C-010,
including a limited health service contract, as defined in KRS 304.38A-010;
(i) Coverage under which benefits for medical expenses are:
1. Contained in, or included as a rider, amendment, or supplemental policy provision to, any
liability insurance policy or contract or equivalent self-insurance; or
2. Supplemental to other insurance or equivalent self-insurance benefits, including the
following:
a. Automobile medical-payment insurance; and
b. Life insurance or endowment or annuity contracts;
(j) Medical expense reimbursement coverage that is:
1. Specifically designed to supplement, or fill gaps in, primary health insurance coverage; and
2. Provided under a policy, plan, certificate, or contract that is separate from the primary health
insurance coverage;
(k) Coverage or benefits provided under:
1. KRS Chapter 205 or 342; or
2. Any other statutory-based public assistance or compensation program;
(l) Coverage or benefits for on-site medical clinics;
(m) Coverage or benefits provided under a health flexible spending arrangement; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(n) Other types of similar or limited insurance, coverage, or benefits, to the extent specified by the
commissioner in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.